Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
General Provisions

§ 25-53-1.
Establishment of department; declaration of purposes [Last paragraph repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The Legislature recognizes that in order for the State of Mississippi to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation, there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor. The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that for these and other related purposes there is hereby established an agency of state government to be known as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS). The Legislature further declares that the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) shall provide statewide services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions. State agencies shall work in full cooperation with the board of MDITS to identify opportunities to minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the Department of Human Services for a period of three (3) years beginning July 1, 2017. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the Department of Child Protection Services for a period of three (3) years beginning July 1, 2017.

Notwithstanding the exemption of the Department of Human Services and the Department of Child Protection Services from the provisions of this section, before the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services may take an action that would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section, the department(s) shall give notice of the proposed action to the MDITS for any recommendations by the MDITS. Upon receipt of the notice, the MDITS shall post the notice on its website and on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165. If the MDITS does not respond to the department(s) within seven (7) calendar days after receiving the notice, the department(s) may take the proposed action. If the MDITS responds to the department(s) within seven (7) calendar days, then the MDITS has seven (7) calendar days from the date of its initial response to provide any additional recommendations. After the end of the second seven-day period, the department(s) may take the proposed action. The MDITS is not authorized to disapprove any proposed actions that would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section. This paragraph shall stand repealed on July 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-61; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 494, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-53-3.
Definitions.

Whenever the term “Central Data Processing Authority” or the term “authority,” when referring to the Central Data Processing Authority, is used in any law, rule, regulation, document or elsewhere, it shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

For the purposes of this chapter the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Central Data Processing Authority” and “CDPA” mean “Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS)” and the term “authority” means “board of the MDITS.”

“Bureau of Systems Policy and Planning,” “Bureau of Telecommunications,” “Bureau of Central Data Processing” and “bureau” mean “Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.”

“Computer equipment or services” means any information technology, computer or computer related telecommunications equipment, electronic word processing and office systems, or services utilized in connection therewith, including, but not limited to, all phases of computer software and consulting services, and insurance on all state-owned computer equipment.

“Acquisition” of computer or telecommunications equipment or services means the purchase, lease, rental, or acquisition in any other manner of any such computer or telecommunications equipment or services.

“Agency” means and includes all the various state agencies, officers, departments, boards, commissions, offices and institutions of the state.

“Governing authority” means boards of supervisors, governing boards of all school districts, all boards of directors of public water supply districts, boards of directors of master public water supply districts, municipal public utility commissions, governing authorities of all municipalities, port authorities, commissioners and boards of trustees of any public hospitals and any political subdivision of the state supported wholly or in part by public funds of the state or political subdivisions thereof.

“Bid” means any of the valid source selection techniques and competitive procurement methods appropriate to information technology procurement in the public sector, including, but not limited to, competitive sealed bidding, competitive sealed proposals, simplified small purchase procedures, sole source procurements, and emergency procurements.

“Telecommunications transmission facility” means any transmission medium, switch, instrument, inside wiring system or other facility which is used, in whole or part, to provide any transmission.

“Equipment support contract” means a contract which covers a single, specific class or classes of telecommunications equipment or service and all features associated with that class, through which state agencies may purchase or lease the item of equipment or service specified by issuing a purchase order under the terms of the contract without the necessity of further competitive bidding.

“Inside wiring system” means any wiring which:

Directly or indirectly, interconnects any terminal equipment with any other terminal equipment or with any regulated facility or common carrier services; and

Is located at the premises of the customer and is not inside any terminal equipment.

“Procurement” means the selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining telecommunications equipment, system or related services, as well as activities engaged in, resulting in or expected to result in selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining telecommunications equipment.

“Telecommunications equipment, systems, related services” are limited to the equipment and means to provide:

Telecommunications transmission facilities.

Telephone systems, including voice processing systems.

Facsimile systems.

Radio paging services.

Mobile telephone services, including cellular mobile telephone service.

Intercom and paging systems.

Video teleconferencing systems.

Personal communications networks and services.

Any and all systems based on emerging and future telecommunications technologies relative to (i) through (viii) above.

“Telecommunications system lease contract” means a contract between a supplier of telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services through which telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, may be leased for a term which shall not exceed sixty (60) months for a system lease valued less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) and shall not exceed one hundred twenty (120) months for a system lease valued One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) or more.

“Tariffed or regulated service” means telecommunications service offered by common carriers and subject to control by the Mississippi Public Service Commission or the Federal Communications Commission.

“State Data Center” means one or more facilities operated by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to provide information technology resources requiring enterprise computing resources or any other centrally managed information resources.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-61; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 457; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 498, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-53-5.
Powers, duties and responsibilities; funding of agency expenses. [Subparagraph (a)(ii) repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The authority shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities:

(i) The authority shall provide for the development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of computer equipment and services by all agencies of state government, and provide for their implementation. In so doing, the authority may use the MDITS’ staff, at the discretion of the executive director of the authority, or the authority may contract for the services of qualified consulting firms in the field of information technology and utilize the service of such consultants as may be necessary for such purposes. Pursuant to Section 25-53-1, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the Department of Human Services for a period of three (3) years beginning on July 1, 2017. Pursuant to Section 25-53-1, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the Department of Child Protection Services for a period of three (3) years beginning July 1, 2017.

Notwithstanding the exemption of the Department of Human Services and the Department of Child Protection Services from the provisions of this section, before the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services may take an action that would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section, the department(s) shall give notice of the proposed action to the MDITS for any recommendations by the MDITS. Upon receipt of the notice, the MDITS shall post the notice on its website and on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165. If the MDITS does not respond to the department(s) within seven (7) calendar days after receiving the notice, the department(s) may take the proposed action. If the MDITS responds to the department(s) within seven (7) calendar days, then the MDITS has seven (7) calendar days from the date of its initial response to provide any additional recommendations. After the end of the second seven-day period, the department(s) may take the proposed action. The MDITS is not authorized to disapprove any proposed actions that would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section. This subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on July 1, 2020.

The authority shall immediately institute procedures for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and supervise the efficient execution of the powers and duties of the office of executive director of the authority. In the execution of its functions under this chapter, the authority shall maintain as a paramount consideration the successful internal organization and operation of the several agencies so that efficiency existing therein shall not be adversely affected or impaired. In executing its functions in relation to the institutions of higher learning and junior colleges in the state, the authority shall take into consideration the special needs of such institutions in relation to the fields of teaching and scientific research.

Title of whatever nature of all computer equipment now vested in any agency of the State of Mississippi is hereby vested in the authority, and no such equipment shall be disposed of in any manner except in accordance with the direction of the authority or under the provisions of such rules and regulations as may hereafter be adopted by the authority in relation thereto.

The authority shall adopt rules, regulations, and procedures governing the acquisition of computer and telecommunications equipment and services which shall, to the fullest extent practicable, insure the maximum of competition between all manufacturers of supplies or equipment or services. In the writing of specifications, in the making of contracts relating to the acquisition of such equipment and services, and in the performance of its other duties the authority shall provide for the maximum compatibility of all information systems hereafter installed or utilized by all state agencies and may require the use of common computer languages where necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The authority may establish by regulation and charge reasonable fees on a nondiscriminatory basis for the furnishing to bidders of copies of bid specifications and other documents issued by the authority.

The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the sharing with, or the sale or lease of information technology services to any nonstate agency or person. Such regulations shall provide that any such sharing, sale or lease shall be restricted in that same shall be accomplished only where such services are not readily available otherwise within the state, and then only at a charge to the user not less than the prevailing rate of charge for similar services by private enterprise within this state.

The authority may, in its discretion, establish a special technical advisory committee or committees to study and make recommendations on technology matters within the competence of the authority as the authority may see fit. Persons serving on the Information Resource Council, its task forces, or any such technical advisory committees shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of such duties, together with mileage as provided by law for state employees, provided the same has been authorized by a resolution duly adopted by the authority and entered on its minutes prior to the performance of such duties.

The authority may provide for the development and require the adoption of standardized computer programs and may provide for the dissemination of information to and the establishment of training programs for the personnel of the various information technology centers of state agencies and personnel of the agencies utilizing the services thereof.

The authority shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring the reporting to the authority through the office of executive director of such information as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and may also establish such reasonable procedures to be followed in the presentation of bills for payment under the terms of all contracts for the acquisition of computer equipment and services now or hereafter in force as may be required by the authority or by the executive director in the execution of their powers and duties.

The authority shall require such adequate documentation of information technology procedures utilized by the various state agencies and may require the establishment of such organizational structures within state agencies relating to information technology operations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

The authority may adopt such further reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to fully implement the purposes of this chapter. All rules and regulations adopted by the authority shall be published and disseminated in readily accessible form to all affected state agencies, and to all current suppliers of computer equipment and services to the state, and to all prospective suppliers requesting the same. Such rules and regulations shall be kept current, be periodically revised, and copies thereof shall be available at all times for inspection by the public at reasonable hours in the offices of the authority. Whenever possible no rule, regulation or any proposed amendment to such rules and regulations shall be finally adopted or enforced until copies of the proposed rules and regulations have been furnished to all interested parties for their comment and suggestions.

The authority shall establish rules and regulations which shall provide for the submission of all contracts proposed to be executed by the executive director for computer equipment or services to the authority for approval before final execution, and the authority may provide that such contracts involving the expenditure of less than such specified amount as may be established by the authority may be finally executed by the executive director without first obtaining such approval by the authority.

The authority is authorized to purchase, lease, or rent computer equipment or services and to operate that equipment and use those services in providing services to one or more state agencies when in its opinion such operation will provide maximum efficiency and economy in the functions of any such agency or agencies.

Upon the request of the governing body of a political subdivision or instrumentality, the authority shall assist the political subdivision or instrumentality in its development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of computer equipment and services. An appropriate fee shall be charged the political subdivision by the authority for such assistance.

The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the protest procedures to be followed by any actual or prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract for the acquisition of computer equipment or services. Such rules and regulations shall prescribe the manner, time and procedure for making protests and may provide that a protest not timely filed shall be summarily denied. The authority may require the protesting party, at the time of filing the protest, to post a bond, payable to the state, in an amount that the authority determines sufficient to cover any expense or loss incurred by the state, the authority or any state agency as a result of the protest if the protest subsequently is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to have been filed without any substantial basis or reasonable expectation to believe that the protest was meritorious; however, in no event may the amount of the bond required exceed a reasonable estimate of the total project cost. The authority, in its discretion, also may prohibit any prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is a party to any litigation involving any such contract with the state, the authority or any agency of the state to participate in any other such bid, offer or contract, or to be awarded any such contract, during the pendency of the litigation.

The authority shall make a report in writing to the Legislature each year in the month of January. Such report shall contain a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year as specified in Section 25-53-29(3).

All acquisitions of computer equipment and services involving the expenditure of funds in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), or rentals or leases in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c) for the term of the contract, shall be based upon competitive and open specifications, and contracts therefor shall be entered into only after advertisements for bids are published in one or more daily newspapers having a general circulation in the state not less than fourteen (14) days prior to receiving sealed bids therefor. The authority may reserve the right to reject any or all bids, and if all bids are rejected, the authority may negotiate a contract within the limitations of the specifications so long as the terms of any such negotiated contract are equal to or better than the comparable terms submitted by the lowest and best bidder, and so long as the total cost to the State of Mississippi does not exceed the lowest bid. If the authority accepts one (1) of such bids, it shall be that which is the lowest and best.

When applicable, the authority may procure equipment, systems and related services in accordance with the law or regulations, or both, which govern the Bureau of Purchasing of the Office of General Services or which govern the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services procurement of telecommunications equipment, software and services.

The authority is authorized to purchase, lease, or rent information technology and services for the purpose of establishing pilot projects to investigate emerging technologies. These acquisitions shall be limited to new technologies and shall be limited to an amount set by annual appropriation of the Legislature. These acquisitions shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirement.

All fees collected by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.

The authority shall work closely with the council to bring about effective coordination of policies, standards and procedures relating to procurement of remote sensing and geographic information systems (GIS) resources. In addition, the authority is responsible for development, operation and maintenance of a delivery system infrastructure for geographic information systems data. The authority shall provide a warehouse for Mississippi’s geographic information systems data.

The authority shall manage one or more State Data Centers to provide information technology services on a cost-sharing basis. In determining the appropriate services to be provided through the State Data Center, the authority should consider those services that:

Result in savings to the state as a whole;

Improve and enhance the security and reliability of the state’s information and business systems; and

Optimize the efficient use of the state’s information technology assets, including, but not limited to, promoting partnerships with the state institutions of higher learning and community colleges to capitalize on advanced information technology resources.

The authority shall increase federal participation in the cost of the State Data Center to the extent provided by law and its shared technology infrastructure through providing such shared services to agencies that receive federal funds. With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority may provide shared services when mutually agreeable, following a determination by both the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, that the sharing of services is mutually beneficial.

The authority, in its discretion, may require new or replacement agency business applications to be hosted at the State Data Center. With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, may agree that institutions of higher learning or community colleges may utilize business applications that are hosted at the State Data Center, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that the hosting of those applications is mutually beneficial. In addition, the authority may establish partnerships to capitalize on the advanced technology resources of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that such a partnership is mutually beneficial.

The authority shall provide a periodic update regarding reform-based information technology initiatives to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees.

From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund. In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature. These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies. Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to identify computer equipment or services to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8946-61, 8946-62; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 474; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 287; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 410, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 527, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 494, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 433, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 382, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-53-7.
Members of authority; terms; vacancies; surety bond; restriction on beneficial interest in business or body engaged in information business; legislative designees authorized to attend meetings.

The membership of the authority shall be composed of five (5) members to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The initial terms of the members shall be for one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, and thereafter all terms shall be for five (5) years. Each member may continue to serve for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months after the expiration of his term if his successor is not duly appointed. The initial appointments to the reconstituted authority shall be made no later than June 30, 1984, for terms to begin on July 1, 1984. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the unexpired portion of the term vacated. Each member of the authority shall have a minimum of four (4) years’ experience in an information technology-related executive position or prior service as a member of the authority.

Each member of the authority shall be required to furnish a surety bond in the minimum amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) to be approved by the Secretary of State, conditioned according to law and payable to the State of Mississippi, before entering upon his duties. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose.

No member of the authority, nor its executive director, shall, during his term as such member or director, have any substantial beneficial interest in any corporation or other organization engaged in the information technology business either as manufacturer, supplier, lessor, or otherwise. All members and the executive director shall fully disclose in writing any such beneficial interest, and such disclosure shall be entered on the minutes of the authority.

The Lieutenant Governor may designate one (1) Senator and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate one (1) Representative to attend any meeting of the authority. The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend such meetings of the authority. Such legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the authority. For attending meetings of the authority, such legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the authority will be paid while the Legislature is in session. No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the authority without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8946-62, 8946-64; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, §§ 2, 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, §§ 2, 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 281, 282; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 518, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2011.).

§ 25-53-9.
Compensation and expense allowances.

The members of the authority shall be compensated by a per diem as is authorized by Section 25-3-69 for each day spent in actual discharge of their duties, and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in Section 25-3-41. No authority member may incur per diem, travel, or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote at a meeting of the authority, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of said meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-65; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 5; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 283, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-53-11.
Meetings and organization.

The authority shall meet regularly at a place designated by it once each calendar month and shall meet at such other times as may be set upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members of the authority. At its first meeting, the authority shall organize and elect a chairman and vice-chairman and, as soon as practicable thereafter, the authority shall adopt such rules and regulations, not contrary to the provisions of this chapter and the other laws of the State of Mississippi, as shall be necessary and proper to govern its proceedings. The authority may either elect a secretary from among its membership or delegate the executive director or another employee of the authority as its secretary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-67; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 25-53-13.
Quorum.

In order to have a quorum for a meeting of the authority, at least three (3) members of the authority must be present.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-63; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 284, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-53-15.
Votes.

Any member of the authority may have his vote on any question before the authority recorded on the minutes thereof at the time of the vote, and a member of the authority who votes against an illegal or unauthorized expenditure of funds may not be held liable therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-64; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 25-53-17.
Minutes and records.

The authority shall keep full, complete, and permanent minutes and records of all its proceedings, including the rules and regulations adopted by it, and said minutes shall be signed by the chairman, or vice-chairman, and attested by the secretary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-71; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 11.

§ 25-53-19.
Executive director; employees.

The authority shall select an executive director, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who shall be the administrative officer of the authority and shall perform such duties as are required of him by law and such other duties as may be assigned him by the authority, and who shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the authority, subject to the approval of the state personnel board. In addition, he shall be entitled to remuneration for his necessary traveling expenses consistent with general law.

The executive director shall be a graduate of an accredited university with a degree in engineering, business administration, electronic communications, information technology or a related field, with at least ten (10) years’ experience in information technology, electronic communications, or a related field, of which at least five (5) years shall be in a responsible high level management position with a demonstrated record of management expertise demonstrated through knowledge in the application of information technology and electronic communications. The qualifications for the executive director prescribed herein shall not apply to the executive director serving on June 30, 1984.

The executive director shall have no vote in the decisions of said authority, but shall offer such professional or technical advice and assistance to the authority as may be required of him. Said executive director, in order to qualify for his position, shall be required to make a good and sufficient bond in some surety company qualified and doing business in the State of Mississippi, in the minimum penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties as required by law and the directives of the authority. The premium on said bond shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose. Said executive director may be removed at any time upon a majority vote of the membership of said authority.

The executive director, with the approval of the authority, shall employ such technical, professional, and clerical help as may be authorized by the authority; and the authority, upon the recommendation of the executive director, shall define the duties and fix the compensation of such employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8946-66; Laws, 1968, ch. 499, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 466, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 288; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.